Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 32 Obstructing Justice

11-32-1.
Obstructing officer in execution of duty.

Every person who shall obstruct any officer, civil, military, or otherwise, including any state, city, or town police, deputy sheriff, or fire fighter, while in the execution of his or her office or duty, shall be imprisoned not exceeding one year or be fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 276, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 342, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 394, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 605, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

11-32-1

; G.L. 1971, ch. 220, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 186, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 37.

11-32-2.
False report of crime.

Every person who shall knowingly make or cause to be made a false statement of a crime, either oral or written, with intent that it be relied upon by a police officer of any city or town or by any member of the state police, shall be deemed guilty of obstructing an officer and shall be imprisoned not exceeding one year and/or be fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500), and shall in addition to this imprisonment and/or fine be ordered to make restitution to the person falsely accused of a crime for any damage which the person sustained as a result of the false complaint.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 184, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 176, § 1.

11-32-3.
Obstruction of the judicial system.

Whoever corruptly, maliciously, recklessly, by threats or force, or by any threatening letter or communication, endeavors to influence, intimidate, or impede any grand or petit juror or officer in or of any court of this state or officer who may be serving at any examination or other proceeding before any justice, magistrate, or other officer of the court, in the discharge of his or her duty; or injures any party on his or her person or property on account of his or her attending or having attended such court or examination before such justice, magistrate, or other officer, or on account of his or her testifying or having testified to any matter pending in it; or injures any grand or petit juror in his or her person or property on account of any verdict or indictment assented to by him or her, or on account of being or having been a juror, or injures any justice, magistrate, or other officer in his or her person or property on account of the performance of his or her official duties; or corruptly, maliciously, recklessly, or by threats or force, or by any threatening letter or communication, influences, obstructs, or impedes, or endeavors to influence, obstruct, or impede, the due administration of justice; shall be fined not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or imprisoned not more than five (5) years, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 193, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 91, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 442, § 5.

11-32-4.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following terms mean:

“Malice” means an intent to vex, annoy, harm, or injure in any way another person, or to thwart or interfere in any manner with the orderly administration of justice.

“Victim” means any natural person against whom any crime as defined under the laws of this state or any other state or of the United States is being or has been perpetrated or attempted to be perpetrated.

“Witness” means any natural person:

Having knowledge of the existence or nonexistence of facts relating to any crime;

Whose declaration under oath is received or has been received as evidence for any purpose;

Who has reported any crime to any peace officer, prosecutor, probation or parole officer, correctional officer or judicial officer;

Who has been served with a subpoena issued under the authority of any court in the state, or of any other state or of the United States; or

Who would be believed by any reasonable person to be an individual described in paragraphs (i) — (iv) of this subdivision.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 91, § 2.

11-32-5.
Intimidation of witnesses and victims of crimes.

Any person who, by expressly or impliedly threatening to commit any unlawful act, maliciously and knowingly communicates with another person with the specific intent to intimidate a victim of a crime or a witness in any criminal proceeding with respect to that person’s participation in any criminal proceeding shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or imprisoned not more than one year, or both.

Any person who, with the specific intent to intimidate a victim of a crime or a witness in any criminal proceeding with respect to that person’s participation in any criminal proceeding, causes a physical injury to or damages the property of any person or expressly or impliedly threatens to cause physical injury to or damage to the property of any person, or, with specific intent to intimidate, acts for pecuniary gain shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or imprisoned not more than five (5) years, or both.

As used in this section, “criminal proceeding” means the filing of a criminal complaint, any grand jury proceedings, any trial or hearing conducted in any court relating to a criminal matter, any proceeding before the parole board or any official inquiry into an alleged criminal violation.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent an attorney from interviewing any witness or victim or from otherwise investigating a matter on behalf of a client in an otherwise lawful manner.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 91, § 2; P.L. 1982, ch. 372, § 1.

11-32-6.
Jurisdiction of district, superior and family courts.

Any court with jurisdiction over any criminal matter, including the family court when it has jurisdiction of a juvenile by virtue of a wayward or delinquent petition alleging the violation of any criminal statute of the state of Rhode Island, may, in its discretion, upon good cause (which may include, but is not limited to, credible hearsay or the declaration of the prosecutor or defense attorney) that intimidation or dissuasion of any person who is a victim or who is a witness, has occurred or is reasonably likely to occur, issue orders including, but not limited to, the following:

An order that a defendant not violate any provision of this chapter.

An order that a person before the court other than a defendant, including, but not limited to, a subpoenaed witness or other person entering the courtroom of the court, not violate any provisions of this chapter.

An order that any person described in this subsection maintain a prescribed geographic distance from any specified witness or victim.

An order that any person described in this subsection have no communication whatsoever with any specified witness or any victim, except through an attorney under any reasonable restrictions that the court may impose.

An order calling for a hearing to determine if an order as described in subdivisions (1) through (4) of this subsection should be issued.

An order that a particular law enforcement agency within the jurisdiction of the court provide protection for a victim and/or witness.

Every person violating any order made pursuant to subsection (a) of this section may be punished in any or all manner as follows:

For any substantive offense described in §

11-32-5

.

As a contempt of the court making the order. No finding of contempt shall be a bar to prosecution for a substantive offense under §

11-32-5

, but any conviction or acquittal for any substantive offense under § 11-32-5 shall be a bar to subsequent punishment for contempt arising out of the same act.

By revocation of any form of pretrial release and/or the forfeiture of bail and the issuance of a bench warrant for the defendant’s arrest or remanding him or her into custody. Revocation may, after a hearing and upon showing by clear and convincing evidence, in the sound discretion of the court, be made whether the violation order complained of has been personally committed by the defendant or was in any way caused or encouraged to have been committed by the defendant.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 91, § 2; P.L. 1981, ch. 134, § 1.

11-32-7.
Pretrial release.

Any pretrial release of any defendant, whether on bail or under any other form of recognizance, shall be deemed as a matter of law to include a condition that the defendant neither do nor cause to be done nor knowingly permit to be done on his or her behalf any act proscribed in this chapter.

Every person who willfully violates this condition of pretrial release is subject to revocation of release and for the forfeiture of bail and the issuance of a bench warrant for the defendant’s arrest or remanding him or her into custody whether or not the defendant was the subject of an order under §

11-32-6

.

From and after May 8, 1980, any receipt for any bail or bond given by any court by any surety or bondsman and/or any written promise to appear on one’s own recognizance shall contain, in a conspicuous location, notice of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 91, § 2.